en: Snowboard construction: Camber; Flat; Hybrid; Rocker; Other
el: Κατασκευή snowboard: Κύρτωμα; Επίπεδη; Υβριδικό; Άρθρωση; Άλλο
fr: Fabrication du snowboard: Classique; Plate; Hybrid; Rocker; Autre
vi: Xây dựng ván trượt tuyết: Ván vồng; Phẳng; Ván kết hợp; Ván võng; Khác
da: Snowboardkonstruktion: Camber; Flad; Hybrid; Rocker; Andet
zh-CN: 滑雪板构造: 正拱; 扁平的; 混合型; 弯曲; 其他
sl-SI: Konstrukcija deske za deskanje na snegu: Camber; Ravno; Hibrid; Gugalno; Drugo
hu: Snowboard felépítése: Ívelt; Egyenes; Hibrid; Egyensúlyozó; Egyéb
nl: Constructie snowboard: Camber; Vlak; Hybride; Rocker; Andere
ru: Конструкция сноуборда: С прогибом; Плоский; Гибридные; Рокер; Другие
pt-BR: Estrutura do snowboard: Camber; Plana; Híbrida; Rocker; Outro
ro-RO: Construcție snowboard: Camber; Plat; Hibrid; Rocker; Altele
ko: 스노보드 구성: 캠버; 플랫; 하이브리드; 로커; 기타
sk-SK: Konštrukcia snowboardu: Ohnutý; Plochý; Hybridný; Kolísavý; Iné
sv: Konstruktion av snowboard: Camber; Platt; Hybrid; Rocker; Övrigt
bg-BG: Конструкция на сноуборд: Камбер; Плосък; Хибрид; Извит; Други
hr-HR: Konstrukcija snowboarda: Camber; Ravni; Hibridni; Rocker; Ostalo
th: โครงสร้างของสโนว์บอร์ด: แคมเบอร์; ราบ; แบบไฮบริด; ร็อคเกอร์; อื่นๆ
ja: スノーボード構造: キャンバー; フラット; ハイブリッド; ロッカー; その他
de: Snowboard-Konstruktion: Camber; Flach; Hybrid; Rocker; Sonstiges
cs: Konstrukce snowboardu: Camber; Plochý; Hybridní; Rocker; Jiné
pl: Konstrukcja snowboardu: Ugięcie; Płaski; Hybrydowy; Wahacz; Inne
lt-LT: Snieglentės konstrukcija: Išgaubta; Plokščia; Hibridinė; Lenkta; Kita
es: Construcción de la tabla de snowboard: Cángulo; Puro; Híbrido; Balancín; Otros
fi: Lumilaudan rakenne: Sivuvietto; Tasainen; Hybridi; Keinuva; Muu
nb: Snowboardkonstruksjon: Kamber; Flat; Hybrid; Rocker; Annet
zh-TW: 滑雪板構造: 弧面; 平坦; 混合; 滑雪板; 其他
tr: Snowboard yapımı: Kavis; Düz; Hibrit; Sallanan; Diğer
pt-PT: Construção de snowboard: Cambagem; Plano; Híbrido; Baloiços; Outro
it: Costruzione di snowboard: Curvatura; Piatto; Ibrido; Rocker; Altro